California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

8604.

(a) The board shall, on or before the first Monday in July of each year, file with the board of supervisors the final budget which sets forth all estimated expenditures of the district for the fiscal year commencing on the first day of July. A copy of the budget shall also at the same time be filed with the auditor of the county.

(b) The board of supervisors shall annually, at the time of levying other county taxes, levy an assessment upon all the citrus trees planted or growing in the district, regardless of age, as assessed by the assessor pursuant to this part. The rate shall be such as will produce, after due allowance for delinquency, the amount determined as necessary to be raised on the secured roll. If a fraction of a cent occurs on a valuation of one hundred dollars ($100), it shall be taken as a full cent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

8605.

The assessment authorized to be assessed and levied is hereby declared to be in the nature of a special assessment, and the Legislature hereby finds that the owners of all citrus trees will be benefited by the district to the same extent and in the same manner regardless of the age of the trees. The assessments authorized by this chapter to be assessed and levied on the trees shall be assessed and levied on all citrus trees regardless of their age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

8606.

The tax so levied shall be computed and entered upon the assessment roll by the county auditor, and if the supervisors fail to levy the tax as required, the auditor shall do so. The tax shall be collected at the same time, and in the same manner as, and together with and not separate from, general county taxes, and when collected shall be paid into the county treasury for the use of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8607.

The general provisions of the laws of this state, prescribing the manner of levying and collecting county taxes and the duties of the several county officers with respect to levying and collecting county taxes, are, so far as they are applicable and not in conflict with the specific provisions of this part, hereby adopted and made a part of this part. The several county officers thus referred to shall be liable upon their several official bonds for the faithful discharge of the duties imposed upon them by this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8608.

The county treasury shall be the repository of all the moneys of the district. The county treasurer shall receive and receipt for all such moneys, and place the same to the credit of the district. He shall be responsible upon his official bond for the safekeeping and disbursement, in the manner provided in this part, of all moneys of the district so held by him.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8609.

If a consolidated district includes parts of two or more counties, the repository of all money of the district shall be the county treasury of the county in which is located the largest area of the district. Money collected for the use of the district in any other county in which a part of the district is located shall be transferred by the county treasurer upon warrant of the county auditor of the county in which the money was collected to the county treasurer of the county serving as repository for the district, in the same manner as prescribed for the disbursement of money held for a local district. Money derived from any county in which the district is located may be expended in any part of the district for the purposes authorized by this part, notwithstanding any other provision of law limiting the expenditure of any such money to a specific area or county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.

The county treasurer shall pay out money of the district only upon warrants of the county auditor drawn upon the order of the board of directors of the district signed by the chairman or vice chairman and attested by the secretary or assistant secretary. The county treasurer, with the approval of the board of supervisors, shall pay out the money of the district upon one master warrant of the county auditor drawn upon the order of the board of directors of the district and signed by the chairman or vice chairman and attested to by the secretary or assistant secretary, to meet the district’s expenses, including salaries, at such intervals as is approved by the board of supervisors. The county treasurer shall report in writing on the first day of July, October, January, and March of each year, to the board the amount of money he then holds for the districts, the amount of receipts since his last report, and the amounts paid out. Each such report shall be verified and filed with the secretary of the district to whom it is addressed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 231.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Inclusion of Lands [8651. - 8651.]

8651.

Lands devoted exclusively to the growing of citrus fruits within a tract of land outside the district but in the county wherein the district is located may be annexed to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Consolidation [8701. - 8707.]

8701.

Any two or more districts organized or existing under this part may be consolidated, whether or not the boundaries are coterminous and whether or not the districts are located in the same county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8702.

Proceedings for consolidation may be initiated by the filing of a petition for consolidation with the board of each district to be consolidated. Each petition shall be signed by the owners of 51 percent by area of the citrus land in the district. Upon the filing of a petition, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution which recites the fact of receipt and the willingness of the district to consolidate, and shall then send copies of the petition and resolution to the board of directors of each of the other districts. The board shall send the original petition and a certified copy of the resolution to the board of supervisors of the county in which is located the largest area of citrus acreage of the proposed consolidated district, and a copy of the petition and resolution to the board of supervisors of each of the other counties in which is located any part of the proposed consolidated district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

8703.

Upon presentation and filing of the petitions of two or more districts proposing consolidation, the board of supervisors of the county in which is located the largest area of citrus acreage of the proposed consolidated district shall fix a time and place for hearing the petitions. Notice shall be given and the hearing conducted in the same manner and with the same effect as prescribed for the formation of a district pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8451).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8704.

If the board of supervisors determines that the consolidation is feasible and for the best interests of the citrus growers of the respective districts, it shall by resolution duly adopted declare the districts consolidated into one district, giving the consolidated district a name which name shall include the term “consolidated.” Certified copies of the resolution shall be filed with the Secretary of State and, for record, with the county recorder of each county in which is located any part of the consolidated district. Upon the filing, the districts are consolidated into a single consolidated district with all the rights, privileges, and powers of a district. The consolidated district shall succeed to all the funds and other property, and is subject to all the indebtedness, bonded and otherwise, of the districts consolidated. Each district which is included in the consolidated district shall continue in existence for the purpose of representation on the board of the consolidated district, and for the purpose of levying, assessing, and collecting assessments for district purposes. The board of the consolidated district is, however, the board of each district which is included in the consolidated district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

8705.

Upon the adoption of a resolution consolidating two or more districts, the board of supervisors shall immediately appoint a board of directors of at least five members, including at least one member from each of the districts which are included in the consolidated district. If any of the districts which are included in the consolidated district includes more than 15,000 acres of citrus acreage, the board of directors shall be increased to a number equal to the number of districts which are included in the consolidated district, plus one additional director for each 10,000 acres, or major fraction of 10,000 acres, in any one district which is included in the consolidated district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

8706.

The board of a consolidated district has all the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the board of any other district. The members of the board shall be appointed in the same manner and serve for the same term as the directors of any other district. If, however, the number of directors is increased to more than five, as provided in Section 8705, the sixth member of the first board shall serve for three years, the seventh for two years, and all in excess of seven for one year each.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8707.

Any district which has been included in a consolidated district may withdraw from the consolidated district and be reconstituted as a separate district by filing with the board of directors of the consolidated district a petition for withdrawal which is signed by the owners of not less than 51 percent by area of citrus land in the district. The board of directors of the consolidated district shall send the original petition to the board of supervisors of the county in which the withdrawing district is located, and a copy of the petition to the board of supervisors of each of the other counties in which is located any part of the consolidated district. Upon receipt of a petition for withdrawal, the board of supervisors of the county in which the withdrawing district is located shall fix a time and place for hearing the petition. Notice shall be given and the hearing conducted in the same manner and with the same effect as prescribed for the formation of a district under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8451). Upon withdrawal of a district, all moneys collected from the district for the use of the consolidated district, and all property purchased with these moneys, shall remain the property of the consolidated district. All moneys collected from a district after it withdraws from a consolidated district shall be held for the use of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Dissolution of Districts [8751. - 8759.]

8751.

Upon the filing of a petition with the board of supervisors, signed by the owners of not less than 60 percent by area of the citrus acreage in the district, requesting the dissolution of the district, the board of supervisors shall set a time and place for hearing on the petition, which shall not be less than 20 days, nor more than 40 days, after the filing of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

8752.

The board of supervisors shall give notice of the time and place fixed for the hearing upon the petition for dissolution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8753.

The notice of hearing shall state all of the following:

(a) That a petition has been filed requesting the dissolution of the district. 

(b) That the petition is available for inspection at the offices of the board of supervisors.

(c) The time and place for the hearing.

(d) That at such hearing protests against the dissolution of the district shall be considered by the board of supervisors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8754.

Notice of such hearing shall be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation published and circulated in the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8755.

The notice shall be published once a week for two successive weeks prior to the date set for the hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8756.

If, at the hearing, a majority of the members of the board of supervisors find that the dissolution of the district will benefit the citrus industry of the county, it shall by resolution dissolve the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

8757.

The board of supervisors shall cause a certified copy of the resolution to be recorded in the office of the county recorder and shall file a certified copy of the same with the Secretary of State. Thereupon, the district is dissolved for all purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8758.

Upon dissolution, the right, title, and interest to property owned or controlled by the district which is situated within the corporate limits of any city shall vest absolutely in such city. If such property is situated without the corporate limits of the city, it shall vest in the county in which the property is situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8759.

The board of supervisors is ex officio the governing body of the dissolved district. It may levy such taxes and assessments and perform such other acts as may be necessary to wind up the affairs of the district and to raise money for the payment of any outstanding indebtedness.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5.5. OLIVE, STONE, AND POME FRUIT PEST DISTRICT CONTROL LAW [8760. - 8772.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [8760. - 8772.]

8760.

This part shall be known as the Olive, Stone, and Pome Fruit Pest District Control Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 179, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8761.

All of Part 5 (commencing with Section 8401) applies to olive, stone, and pome fruit pest control districts and is hereby incorporated in this part as though set forth in full in this part unless a provision in this part expressly states that the provision is not applicable to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 179, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8762.

Any district formed pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 8401) to control and eradicate olive, stone, and pome fruit pests shall continue in existence without further proceedings and shall be subject to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 179, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8763.

Sections 8451, 8551, 8553, 8554, 8555, 8556, 8601, 8602, 8603, and 8604, and subdivision (b) of Section 8563 do not apply to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

8764.

It is the purpose of this part to make available a procedure for the organization, operation, government, and dissolution of districts for the more effective control and eradication of olive, stone, and pome fruit pests, whichever products the district is established to protect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 179, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8764.5.

Proceedings for the formation of a district within any county shall be commenced by a petition that is signed by the owners of not less than 51 percent by area of the land in the proposed district, which may be composed of noncontiguous parcels within the county devoted exclusively to the growing of olive, stone, and pome fruit trees. The petition shall be addressed to, and filed with, the board of supervisors of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 179, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8764.6.

(a) In determining the boundaries of the district, the board of supervisors shall exclude from the district any olive, stone, and pome fruit acreage that it finds will not be benefited by the proposed project, and it may include in the district any noncontiguous lands that it finds will be benefited if it also finds it will be in the interest of the district to include these lands. The inclusion may be upon application of the owner or, without the owner’s application, upon giving the owner notice of the proposed inclusion and an opportunity for a hearing on it.

(b) Notice of inclusion shall be mailed, postage prepaid, by the clerk of the board of supervisors, to the address of the owner of the land as shown by the last equalized county assessment roll, and to any person that has filed with the clerk that person’s name and address and description of land in which he or she has either a legal or equitable interest. The notice shall describe the land proposed to be included, and shall state the time and place at which objections to the inclusion will be heard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 179, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8765.

“Olive, stone, and pome fruit acreage” means any parcel, tract, or lot of land with 10 or more olive, stone, or pome fruit trees of any age growing on it with a commercial value of at least two hundred fifty dollars ($250), except a parcel, tract, or lot that is used as a nursery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 179, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8766.

The district shall have perpetual succession and may do all of the following:

(a) Sue and be sued in all actions and proceedings in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction. Section 820.9 of the Government Code applies to this subdivision.

(b) Adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(c) Take by grant, purchase, gift, devise, lease, or otherwise, and hold, use and enjoy, and lease, or otherwise dispose of, real and personal property of every kind and description within or without the district necessary to the full and convenient exercise of its powers.

(d) Cause assessments to be levied, as provided in this chapter to pay any obligation of the district and to accomplish the purposes of the district in the manner provided in this part.

(e) Make contracts, and employ, except as otherwise provided in this part, all persons, firms, and corporations necessary to carry out the purposes and the powers of the district, and at any salary, wage, or other compensation as the board of directors shall determine.

(f) Eradicate, remove, or prevent the spread of any and all olive, stone, or pome fruit pests.

(g) Enter into or upon any land included within the boundaries of the district for the purpose of inspecting and treating the olive, stone, or pome fruit trees and other host plants and fruit growing on them.

(h) Perform any and all acts either within or outside the district necessary or proper to fully and completely carry out the purposes for which the district was organized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 179, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8767.

In order to expedite the elimination of the source of the olive fruit fly and the apple maggot, a district may, with the consent of the owner, remove trees that have not been determined to be infested with the olive fruit fly or the apple maggot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 179, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8768.

The board in which the district is located shall, after consultation with the commissioner, supervise and direct, in accordance with the best known and accepted methods as determined by the board, all activities undertaken by the district for the control or eradication of olive, stone, or pome fruit pests. The board may authorize the use of nonchemical alternatives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 179, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8769.

(a) The board, annually after the organization of the district, shall assess any assessor’s parcel of real property with 10 or more olive, stone, or pome fruit trees on it and enter as a separate item, on an annual assessment roll for each assessor’s parcel of real property included in the district, the number of all olive, stone, or pome fruit trees that are growing on it.

(b) For the purpose of this part, the board shall assess all olive, stone, or pome fruit acreage at a uniform value per tree. The assessment shall be upon a tree basis and the number of trees shall be determined conclusively by the board counting the trees on each assessor’s parcel. The board, in counting the olive, stone, or pome fruit trees, shall not, however, count any more than 100 trees on any one acre of land.

(c) Upon completing the tree count within the district each year, the board shall separately compute and certify, to the board of supervisors, the total number of all the olive, stone, or pome fruit trees in the district on each parcel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8770.

Whenever new acreage within the district is planted with olive, stone, or pome fruit trees so as to qualify as olive, stone, or pome fruit acreage, the trees are subject to assessment as provided in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8771.

Whenever any olive, stone, or pome fruit trees have been removed from any parcel of land included in the district, the owner of the parcel of land may file with the board an affidavit particularly describing the parcel of land, and setting forth the fact of the removal of the trees. Upon receipt of the affidavit, the board shall cause an investigation of the parcel of land to be made and, if the board finds the statements in the affidavit are true, the board shall immediately verify this fact and the amount of olive, stone, or pome fruit trees removed shall not be assessed on the next assessment roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 179, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8772.

(a) The board shall, on or before the first Monday in July of each year, file with the board of supervisors a list of assessor parcel numbers that sets forth all assessments of the district for the fiscal year commencing on the first day of July. At the same time, a copy of the list shall also be filed with the auditor of the county.

(b) The board of supervisors shall annually, at the time of levying county taxes, levy a special assessment upon all the olive, stone, or pome fruit trees planted or growing in the district regardless of age, as submitted by the district pursuant to subdivision (a). The special assessment shall be added to the secured roll and collected by the county on behalf of the district in the same manner that the county collects county taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 179, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. PEST CONTROL COMPACT [8801. - 8808.]

8801.

The Pest Control Compact is hereby enacted into law and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows:
PEST CONTROL COMPACT
Article I. Findings

The party states find that:

(a) In the absence of the higher degree of cooperation among them possible under this compact, the annual loss of approximately seven billion dollars from the depredations of pests is virtually certain to continue, if not to increase.

(b) Because of varying climatic, geographic and economic factors, each state may be affected differently by particular species of pests; but all states share the inability to protect themselves fully against those pests which present serious dangers to them.

(c) The migratory character of pest infestations makes it necessary for states both adjacent to and distant from one another, to complement each other’s activities when faced with conditions of infestation and reinfestation.

(d) While every state is seriously affected by a substantial number of pests, and every state is susceptible of infestation by many species of pests not now causing damage to its crop and plant life and products, the fact that relatively few species of pests present equal danger to or are of interest to all states makes the establishment and operation of a fund, from which individual states may obtain financial support for pest control programs of benefit to them in other states and to which they may contribute in accordance with their relative interests, the most equitable means of financing cooperative pest eradication and control programs. 
 
Article II. Definitions
As used in this compact, unless the context clearly requires a different construction:

(a) “State” means a state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

(b) “Requesting state” means a state which invokes the procedures of the compact to secure the undertaking or intensification of measures to control or eradicate one or more pests within one or more other states.

(c) “Responding state” means a state requested to undertake or intensify the measures referred to in subdivision (b) of this article.

(d) “Pests” means any invertebrate animal, pathogen, parasitic plant or similar or allied organism which can cause disease or damage in any crops, trees, shrubs, grasses or other plants of substantial value.

(e) “Fund” means the Pest Control Fund established pursuant to this compact. 

(f) “Governing board” means the administrators of this compact representing all of the party states when such administrators are acting as a body in pursuance of authority vested in them by this compact.

(g) “Executive committee” means the committee established pursuant to Article V(e) of this compact. 
 
Article III. The Fund
There is hereby established the Pest Control Fund for the purpose of financing other than normal pest control operations which states may be called upon to engage in pursuant to this compact. The fund shall contain moneys appropriated to it by the party states and any donations and grants accepted by it. All appropriations, except as conditioned by the rights and obligations of party states expressly set forth in this compact, shall be unconditional and may not be restricted by the appropriating state to use in the control of any specified pest or pests. Donations and grants may be conditional or unconditional, provided that the fund shall not accept any donation or grant whose terms are inconsistent with any provision of this compact. 
 
Article IV. The Fund, Internal Operations and Management
(a) The fund shall be administered by a governing board and executive committee as hereinafter provided. The actions of the governing board and executive committee pursuant to this compact shall be deemed the actions of the fund.

(b) The members of the governing board shall be entitled to one vote each on such board. No action of the governing board shall be binding unless taken at a meeting at which a majority of the total number of votes on the governing board are cast in favor thereof. Action of the governing board shall be only at a meeting at which a majority of the members are present.

(c) The fund shall have a seal which may be employed as an official symbol and which may be affixed to documents and otherwise used as the governing board may provide.

(d) The governing board shall elect annually, from among its members, a chairman, a vice chairman, a secretary and a treasurer. The chairman may not succeed himself. The governing board may appoint an executive director and fix his duties and his compensation, if any. Such executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the governing board. The governing board shall make provision for the bonding of such of the officers and employees of the fund as may be appropriate.

(e) Irrespective of the civil service, personnel or other merit system laws of any of the party states, the executive director, or if there be no executive director, the chairman, in accordance with such procedures as the bylaws may provide, shall appoint, remove or discharge such personnel as may be necessary for the performance of the functions of the fund and shall fix the duties and compensations of such personnel. The governing board in its bylaws shall provide for the personnel policies and programs of the fund.

(f) The fund may borrow, accept or contract for the services of personnel from any state, the United States, or any other governmental agency, or from any person, firm, association or corporation.

(g) The fund may accept for any of its purposes and functions under this compact any and all donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, conditional or otherwise, from any state, the United States, or any other governmental agency, or from any person, firm, association or corporation, and may receive, utilize and dispose of the same. Any donation, gift or grant accepted by the governing board pursuant to this paragraph or services borrowed pursuant to paragraph (f) of this article shall be reported in the annual report of the fund. Such report shall include the nature, amount and conditions, if any, of the donation, gift, grant or services borrowed and the identity of the donor or lender.

(h) The governing board shall adopt bylaws for the conduct of the business of the fund and shall have the power to amend and rescind these bylaws. The fund shall publish its bylaws in convenient form and shall file a copy thereof and a copy of any amendment thereto with the appropriate agency or officer in each of the party states.

(i) The fund annually shall make to the Governor and Legislature of each party state a report covering its activities for the preceding year. The fund may make such additional reports as it may deem desirable.

(j) In addition to the powers and duties specifically authorized and imposed, the fund may do such other things as are necessary and incidental to the conduct of its affairs pursuant to this compact. 
 
Article V. Compact Fund Administration
(a) In each party state there shall be a compact administrator, who shall be selected and serve in such manner as the laws of his state may provide, and who shall:

1. Assist in the coordination of activities pursuant to the compact in his state; and

2. Represent his state on the governing board of the fund.

(b) If the laws of the United States specifically so provide, or if administrative provision is made therefor within the federal government, the United States may be represented on the governing board of the fund by not to exceed three representatives. Any such representative or representatives of the United States shall be appointed and serve in such manner as may be provided by or pursuant to federal law, but no such representative shall have a vote on the governing board or on the executive committee thereof.

(c) The governing board shall meet at least once each year for the purpose of determining policies and procedures in the administration of the fund and, consistent with the provisions of the compact, supervising and giving direction to the expenditure of moneys from the fund. Additional meetings of the governing board shall be held on call of the chairman, the executive committee, or a majority of the membership of the governing board.

(d) At such times as it may be meeting, the governing board shall pass upon applications for assistance from the fund and authorize disbursements therefrom. When the governing board is not in session, the executive committee thereof shall act as agent of the governing board, with full authority to act for it in passing upon such applications.

(e) The executive committee shall be composed of the chairman of the governing board and four additional members of the governing board chosen by it so that there shall be one member representing each of four geographic groupings of party states. The governing board shall make such geographic groupings. If there is representation of the United States on the governing board, one such representative may meet with the executive committee. The chairman of the governing board shall be chairman of the executive committee. No action of the executive committee shall be binding unless taken at a meeting at which at least four members of such committee are present and vote in favor thereof. Necessary expenses of each of the five members of the executive committee incurred in attending meetings of such committee, when not held at the same time and place as a meeting of the governing board, shall be charges against the fund. 
 
Article VI. Assistance and Reimbursement
(a) Each party state pledges to each other party state that it will employ its best efforts to eradicate, or control within the strictest practicable limits, any and all pests. It is recognized that performance of this responsibility involves:

1. The maintenance of pest control and eradication activities of interstate significance by a party state at a level that would be reasonable for its own protection in the absence of this compact.

2. The meeting of emergency outbreaks or infestations of interstate significance to no less an extent than would have been done in the absence of this compact.

(b) Whenever a party state is threatened by a pest not present within its borders but present within another party state, or whenever a party state is undertaking or engaged in activities for the control or eradication of a pest or pests, and finds that such activities are or would be impracticable or substantially more difficult of success by reason of failure of another party state to cope with infestation or threatened infestation, that state may request the governing board to authorize expenditures from the fund for eradication or control measures to be taken by one or more of such other party states at a level sufficient to prevent, or to reduce to the greatest practicable extent, infestation or reinfestation of the requesting state. Upon such authorization the responding state or states shall take or increase such eradication or control measures as may be warranted. A responding state shall use moneys made available from the fund expeditiously and efficiently to assist in affording the protection requested.

(c) In order to apply for expenditures from the fund, a requesting state shall submit the following in writing:

1. A detailed statement of the circumstances which occasion the request for the invoking of the compact.

2. Evidence that the pest on account of whose eradication or control assistance is requested constitutes a danger to an agricultural or forest crop, product, tree, shrub, grass or other plant having a substantial value to the requesting state.

3. A statement of the extent of the present and projected program of the requesting state and its subdivisions, including full information as to the legal authority for the conduct of such program or programs and the expenditures being made or budgeted therefor, in connection with the eradication, control, or prevention of introduction of the pest concerned.

4. Proof that the expenditures being made or budgeted as detailed in item 3 do not constitute a reduction of the effort for the control or eradication of the pest concerned or, if there is a reduction, the reasons why the level of program detailed in item 3 constitutes a normal level of pest control activity.

5. A declaration as to whether, to the best of its knowledge and belief, the conditions which in its view occasion the invoking of the compact in the particular instance can be abated by a program undertaken with the aid of moneys from the fund in one year or less, or whether the request is for an installment in a program which is likely to continue for a longer period of time.

6. Such other information as the governing board may require consistent with the provisions of this compact.

(d) The governing board or executive committee shall give due notice of any meeting at which an application for assistance from the fund is to be considered. Such notice shall be given to the compact administrator of each party state and to such other officers and agencies as may be designated by the laws of the party states. The requesting state and any other party state shall be entitled to be represented and present evidence and argument at such meeting.

(e) Upon the submission as required by paragraph (c) of this article and such other information as it may have or acquire, and upon determining that an expenditure of funds is within the purposes of this compact and justified thereby, the governing board or executive committee shall authorize support of the program. The governing board or the executive committee may meet at any time or place for the purpose of receiving and considering an application. Any and all determinations of the governing board or executive committee, with respect to an application, together with the reasons therefor shall be recorded and subscribed in such manner as to show and preserve the votes of the individual members thereof.

(f) A requesting state which is dissatisfied with a determination of the executive committee shall upon notice in writing given within 20 days of the determination with which it is dissatisfied, be entitled to receive a review thereof at the next meeting of the governing board. Determinations of the executive committee shall be reviewable only by the governing board at one of its regular meetings, or at a special meeting held in such manner as the governing board may authorize.

(g) Responding states required to undertake or increase measures pursuant to this compact may receive moneys from the fund, either at the time or times when such state incurs expenditures on account of such measures, or as reimbursement for expenses incurred and chargeable to the fund. The governing board shall adopt and, from time to time, may amend or revise procedures for submission of claims upon it and for payment thereof.
